District of Columbia statutes.
22-3702

Collection and publication of data.

(a)

The Metropolitan Police force shall afford each crime victim the opportunity to submit with the complaint a written statement that contains information to support a claim that the designated act constitutes a bias-related crime.

(b)

The Mayor shall collect and compile data on the incidence of bias-related crime.

(c)

Data collected under subsection (b) of this section shall be used for research or statistical purposes and may not contain information that may reveal the identity of an individual crime victim.

(d)

The Mayor shall publish an annual summary of the data collected under subsection (b) of this section and transmit the summary and recommendations based on the summary to the Council.

May 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-121, § 3, 37 DCR 27
1981 Ed., § 22-4002.